pt-BR/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pt-BR.dic
acarear/ZYPLc
aderir/ZYL
aduzir/ZYLc
aferir/ZYPLDMcv
afoguear/ZYPL
aformosear/ZYPLM
alardear/ZYPLMD
altear/ZYPLMD
apartear/ZYPL
apear/ZYPLM
aperrear/ZYPL
arear/ZYPL
arrear/ZYPLcMD
arrotear/ZYPLMD
arroxear/ZYPL
aspear/ZYPLD
assombrear/ZYPLM
assorear/ZYPLMS
atear/ZYPLDM
atontear/ZYPL
balancear/ZYPLMBRSU
baldear/ZYPLcD
balear/ZYPLc
bambear/ZYPL
bandear/ZYPLM
banquetear/ZYPLD
baquear/ZYL
baratear/ZYPLMD
barbear/ZYPLcDM
basear/ZYPL
biscatear/ZYL
bobear/ZYL
bofetear/ZYPL
bombear/ZYPLM
borboletear/ZYL
bostear/ZYPL!
bracear/ZYL
branquear/ZYPLcMD
bravatear/ZYPL
bronquear/ZYPL
cabecear/ZYPLDM
cacetear/ZYPLc
cachear/ZYPL
calotear/ZYPL
cambalear/ZYLn
campear/ZYPL
carrear/ZYPLDM
cascatear/ZYL
casear/ZYPL
catarrear/ZYL
cear/ZYPL
cercear/ZYPLDM
chacotear/ZYPLcD
chapear/ZYPLD
chatear/ZYPLMcNW
chavear/ZYPLMD
chicotear/ZYPLD
chilrear/ZYLDn
chulear/ZYPL
ciceronear/ZYPL
clarear/ZYPLcMD
coicear/ZYL
colorear/ZYPL
conduzir/ZYPLcRUé
conferir/ZYPLDNWvn
contrabalancear/ZYPL
contrabandear/ZYPL
contraproduzir/ZYL
contrastear/ZYPL
coproduzir/ZYPL
cordear/ZYPLc
cornear/ZYPLMDc!
cornetear/ZYL
costear/ZYPLM
craquear/ZYPLM
crasear/ZYPL
custear/ZYPLM
deduzir/ZYPLc
deferir/ZYPLMvI
desenfrear/ZYPLMB
desfeitear/ZYPLD
desferir/ZYPLM
devanear/ZYPLcD
diferir/ZYPLM
disferir/ZYPL
embostear/ZYPL!
encadear/ZYPLDMcnS
enfear/ZYPL
engradear/ZYPLM
enlamear/ZYPLS
enlear/ZYPL
entear/ZYPL
entremear/ZYPL
enxamear/ZYPL
escamotear/ZYPLDMcvS
escantear/ZYPL
escassear/ZYLM
esfaquear/ZYPLMD
espernear/ZYPLn
estapear/ZYPL
estaquear/ZYPLM
estontear/ZYPLMDn
estrear/ZYPLnR
esverdear/ZYPLM
facear/ZYPL
falsear/ZYPLDMv
fandanguear/ZYPL
fanfarrear/ZYL
farrear/ZYPL
ferir/ZYPLMD
flautear/ZYPL
florear/ZYPL
foguear/ZYPL
folhear/ZYPLcD
franquear/ZYPLDMv
frasear/ZYLDMR
frear/ZYPLMgR
fundear/ZYL
galhardear/ZYPL
garfear/ZYPLD
garrotear/ZYPL
gazear/ZYLDn
gazetear/ZYL
gear/ZYPL
gerir/ZYPLí
glacear/ZYPLn
golear/ZYPLMD
golpear/ZYPLMn
gorjear/ZYPLD
grampear/ZYPLMD
granjear/ZYPLD
guardear/ZYPLM
guerrear/ZYPLD
hackear/ZYPLMcv
hastear/ZYPLM
homenagear/ZYPLné
idear/ZYPL
induzir/ZYPLMD
ingerir/ZYPL
inserir/ZYRPL
interferir/ZYLn
introduzir/ZYPLR
jatear/ZYPLDM
lacrear/ZYPL
ladear/ZYPLM
lagartear/ZYPL
lancear/ZYPLD
laquear/ZYPLcD
lassear/ZYPLM
lastrear/ZYPLM
lisonjear/ZYPLD
lotear/ZYPLDM
macaquear/ZYPLDMc
macetear/ZYPL
malear/ZYPL
manusear/ZYPLcMv
mapear/ZYPLDMvR
marear/ZYPLcn
margear/ZYPLM
massagear/ZYPLMD
matraquear/ZYPLD
metamorfosear/ZYPL
nausear/ZYPLn
nomear/ZYPLDBcnRSUé
olear/ZYPL
ombrear/ZYL
pajear/ZYPL
palavrear/ZYLD
papaguear/ZYPLM
papear/ZYPL
parafrasear/ZYPLD
parear/ZYPLMS
parquear/ZYPLM
passear/ZYPLDn
pastorear/ZYPLc
patentear/ZYPLMcv
pavonear/ZYPL
pelear/ZYPLD
peraltear/ZYL
permear/ZYPLcv
pigarrear/ZYPL
pinotear/ZYL
piratear/ZYPL
pisotear/ZYPLM
planear/ZYPLME
pleitear/ZYPLn
pontear/ZYPL
prantear/ZYPL
preferir/ZYPLNWv
presentear/ZYPLD
preterir/ZYPLMcv
produzir/ZYPLvé
proferir/ZYPLí
propagandear/ZYPL
prosear/ZYL
ralear/ZYPLM
ranquear/ZYPLM
rarear/ZYPLM
rastrear/ZYPLMDví
ratear/ZYPLM
recapear/ZYPLMé
recear/ZYPL
recensear/ZYPLMD
rechear/ZYPLNW
recrear/ZYPLcD
reduzir/ZYPLNWBví
referir/ZYPLMvnU
regorjear/ZYL
relampear/ZYPL
renguear/ZYPL
reproduzir/ZYPLvíU
ricochetear/ZYL
rodear/ZYPLMD
romancear/ZYPLMcv
rosquear/ZYPLDMvS
rotear/ZYPLDM
roxear/ZYPL
saborear/ZYPLD
saltear/ZYPLMDBR
samplear/ZYPLDMg
sanear/ZYPLDMnví
sapatear/ZYPLD
sapear/ZYPL
saracotear/ZYPL
scanear/ZYPLM
seduzir/ZYPLv
semear/ZYPLcDv
serpear/ZYLn
serpentear/ZYLn
setear/ZYPL
sobrenomear/ZYPL
sofrear/ZYPL
sombrear/ZYPLM
soquear/ZYPL
stalkear/ZYPLD
sucatear/ZYPLM
sugerir/ZYPLvU
tapear/ZYPLc
tartamudear/ZYPL
tatear/ZYPLMnv
tempestear/ZYPL
titubear/ZYLDcn
tontear/ZYL
tornear/ZYPLMDv
torpedear/ZYPLM
torquear/ZYPL
tourear/ZYPLD
traduzir/ZYPLDvRí
transferir/ZYPLDvéí
translinear/ZYc
trapacear/ZYPL
tremeluzir/ZYLM
trombetear/ZYPL
trotear/ZYL
upgradear/ZYPL
vagabundear/ZYL
veranear/ZYLn
verear/ZYPLcM
vesguear/ZYL
voltear/ZYPL
zapear/ZYPL
ziguezaguear/ZYLn
zonear/ZYPLM
